Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Chapter 5. Community Services Boards.

§ 37.2-500.
Purpose; community services board; services to be provided.

The Department, for the purposes of establishing, maintaining, and promoting the development of mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services in the Commonwealth, may provide funds to assist any city or county or any combinations of cities or counties or cities and counties in the provision of these services. Every county or city shall establish a community services board by itself or in any combination with other cities and counties, unless it establishes a behavioral health authority pursuant to Chapter 6 (§

37.2-600

et seq.). Every county or city or any combination of cities and counties that has established a community services board, in consultation with that board, shall designate it as an operating community services board, an administrative policy community services board or a local government department with a policy-advisory community services board. The governing body of each city or county that established the community services board may change this designation at any time by ordinance. In the case of a community services board established by more than one city or county, the decision to change this designation shall be the unanimous decision of all governing bodies.

The core of services provided by community services boards within the cities and counties that they serve shall include:

Emergency services;

Same-day mental health screening services;

Outpatient primary care screening and monitoring services for physical health indicators and health risks and follow-up services for individuals identified as being in need of assistance with overcoming barriers to accessing primary health services, including developing linkages to primary health care providers; and

Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for them, case management services.

Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for them, the core of services may include a comprehensive system of inpatient, outpatient, day support, residential, prevention, early intervention, and other appropriate mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services necessary to provide individualized services and supports to persons with mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse. Community services boards may establish crisis stabilization units that provide residential crisis stabilization services.

In order to provide comprehensive mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services within a continuum of care, the community services board shall function as the single point of entry into publicly funded mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services.

A community services board may enter into contracts with private providers to ensure the delivery of services pursuant to this article.

History.

1968, c. 477, § 37.1-194; 1972, c. 498; 1974, c. 404; 1975, c. 200; 1976, cc. 41, 671; 1977, c. 90; 1980, c. 582; 1982, c. 295; 1984, c. 653; 1998, c. 680; 2002, cc. 51, 278; 2005, c. 716; 2010, c. 28; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2017, cc. 458, 607, 683; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 213.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 292, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall review requirements related to qualifications, training, and oversight of individuals designated by community services boards to perform evaluations of individuals taken into custody pursuant to an emergency custody order and to make recommendations for increasing such qualifications, training, and oversight, in order to protect the safety and well-being of individuals who are subject to emergency custody orders and the public. The Department shall report its findings to the Governor and the General Assembly by December 1, 2014.”

Acts 2017, cc. 607 and 683, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2019.”

Acts 2017, cc. 607 and 683, cl. 3 provides: “That, effective July 1, 2021, the core of services provided by community services boards and behavioral health authorities within cities and counties that they serve shall include, in addition to those set forth in subdivisions B 1, 2, and 3 of §

37.2-500

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and subdivisions C 1, 2, and 3 of §

37.2-601

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, respectively, (i) crisis services for individuals with mental health or substance use disorders, (ii) outpatient mental health and substance abuse services, (iii) psychiatric rehabilitation services, (iv) peer support and family support services, (v) mental health services for members of the armed forces located 50 miles or more from a military treatment facility and veterans located 40 miles or more from a Veterans Health Administration medical facility, (vi) care coordination services, and (vii) case management services.”

Acts 2017, cc. 607 and 683, cl. 4 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall report by December 1 of each year to the General Assembly regarding progress in the implementation of the provisions of this act.”’

Acts 2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2, as amended by Acts 2019, c. 854, Item 94 B, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2020, provides: “The Commissioner, Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, is authorized to collect an annual inspection fee, not to exceed $40, from all establishments that are subject to inspection pursuant to Title 3.2, Chapter 51, Code of Virginia. However, any such establishment that is subject to any permit fee, application fee, inspection fee, risk assessment fee, or similar fee imposed by any locality shall be subject to this annual inspection fee only to the extent that the annual inspection fee and the locally-imposed fee, when combined, do not exceed $40. This fee structure shall be subject to the approval of the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry. Any food bank, second harvest certified food bank, food bank member charity, or other food related activity which is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501 (c) (3), which maintains a food handling or storage facility, or any food-related program operated by any Community Services Board, as defined in Title 37.2, Chapter 5, Code of Virginia, shall be exempt from this inspection fee. Also, a producer of fruits and herbs that are dried, without the addition of any other ingredients, and sold only at a local farmers’ market shall be exempt from the fee.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 28, effective March 4, 2010, added the last sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “developmental” for “mental retardation” throughout the section; deleted “of this title” at the end of the second sentence of the first paragraph; and substituted “mental illness, intellectual disability, or substance abuse” for “mental illnesses, mental retardation, or substance abuse” at the end of the second sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 458 in subsection C, inserted “Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for them” at the beginning and substituted “developmental disabilities” for “intellectual disability.”

The 2017 amendments by cc. 607 and 683, effective July 1, 2019, are identical and designated existing paragraphs as subsections A, B, C, and D; and rewrote subsection B, which formerly read: “The core of services provided by community services boards within the cities and counties that they serve shall include emergency services and, subject to the availability of funds appropriated for them, case management services.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 213, effective July 1, 2021, added subsection E.

§ 37.2-501.
Community services board; appointment; membership; duties of fiscal agent.

Every city or county or any combination of counties and cities, before it shall come within the provisions of this chapter, shall establish a community services board with no less than six and no more than 18 members. When any city or county singly establishes a community services board, the board shall be appointed by the governing body of the city or county establishing the board. When any combination of counties and cities establishes a community services board, the board of supervisors of each county or the council of each city shall mutually agree on the size of the board and shall appoint the members of the community services board. Prior to making appointments, the governing body shall disclose the names of those persons being considered for appointment.Appointments to the community services board shall be broadly representative of the community. One-third of the appointments to the board shall be individuals who are receiving or who have received services or family members of individuals who are receiving or who have received services, at least one of whom shall be an individual receiving services. One or more appointments may be nongovernmental service providers. Sheriffs or their designees also shall be appointed, when practical. No employee of the community services board or employee or board member of an organization that receives funding from any community services board shall be appointed a member of that board.No community services board shall be composed of a majority of local government officials, elected or appointed, as members, nor shall any county or city be represented on a board by more than two officials, elected or appointed.The board appointed pursuant to this section shall be responsible to the governing body of each county or city that established it.

The county or city or any combination of cities and counties that establishes an operating or administrative policy board shall receive an independent annual audit of the total revenues and expenditures of that board, a copy of which shall be provided to the Department, and designate an official of one member city or county to act as fiscal agent for the board. The county or city whose designated official serves as fiscal agent for the board in the case of boards established by more than one city or county shall review and act upon the independent audit of the board and, in conjunction with the other cities and counties, arrange for the provision of legal services to the board. When a single county or city establishes an operating or administrative policy board, it shall arrange for the provision of legal services to the board.

The county or city that establishes a policy-advisory board shall provide an annual audit of the total revenues and expenditures of the city or county government department to the board and the Department, carry out the responsibilities and duties enumerated in subsection A of §

37.2-504

and §

37.2-505

, and provide legal services to the board. When any combination of cities and counties establishes a policy-advisory board, those cities and counties shall designate which local government shall operate the city or county government department. This local government shall provide an annual audit of the total revenues and expenditures of that department to the board and the Department, carry out the responsibilities and duties enumerated in subsection A of §

37.2-504

and §

37.2-505

, and, in conjunction with the other cities and counties, arrange for the provision of legal services to the board.

History.

1968, c. 477, § 37.1-195; 1970, c. 346; 1972, c. 498; 1973, c. 78; 1976, c. 671; 1978, c. 11; 1980, c. 582; 1988, c. 285; 1989, c. 254; 1994, c. 939; 1996, c. 412; 1997, c. 323; 1998, cc. 667, 680; 1999, c. 653; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

Cross references.

As to inclusion of an official or designee from a community services board established pursuant to this section on a community policy and management team, and a family assessment and planning team, see §§

2.2-5205

and

2.2-5207

, respectively. As to state pool of funds for community policy and management teams, see §

2.2-5211

.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals who are receiving or who have received services or family members of individuals who are receiving or who have received services, at least one of whom shall be an individual” for “identified consumers or former consumers or family members of consumers or former consumers, at least one of whom shall be a consumer” in the first sentence of the second paragraph of subsection A.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Security at public facility operated by community services board. —

A sheriff may assign a deputy to provide full-time security at a public facility operated by a community services board, such as a program for students that is operated by a community services board in cooperation with a local public school system. See opinion of Attorney General to Lucy E. Phillips, Esquire, Washington County Attorney, 17-012, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 25 (11/16/17).

Use of the word “shall.”. —

Use of the word “shall” in §§

2.2-5205

and

2.2-5207

requires that each community policy and management team and family assessment and planning team include a parent representative. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable C.E. Cliff Hayes Jr., Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 20-040, 2020 Va. AG LEXIS 36 (11/13/20).

§ 37.2-502.
Community services board members; term of office; vacancies; removal.

The term of office of each member of a community services board shall be for three years from January 1 of the year of appointment or, at the option of the governing body of a county or city, from July 1 of the year of appointment, except that of the members first appointed, several shall be appointed for terms of one year each, several for terms of two years each, and the remaining members of the board for terms of three years each. The appointment of members for one-year, two-year, and three-year terms shall be as nearly equal as possible with regard to the total number of members on the board. If a governing body has appointed members for terms commencing January 1 or July 1 but desires to change the date on which the terms of office commence, the governing body may, as the terms of the members then in office expire, appoint successors for terms of two and one-half or three and one-half years, so that the terms expire on June 30 or December 31. In the case of a board established by more than one city or county, the decision to change the date on which terms of office commence shall be the unanimous decision of all governing bodies. Vacancies shall be filled for unexpired terms in the same manner as original appointments. No person shall be eligible to serve more than three full terms; however, a person first appointed to fill an unexpired term may serve three additional full three-year terms. The remainder of a term to which a member is first appointed to fill a vacancy shall not constitute a term in determining the member’s eligibility for reappointment. However, after a one-year period has elapsed since the end of the member’s last three-year term, the governing body may reappoint that member. Any member of a board may be removed by the appointing authority for cause, after being given a written statement of the causes and an opportunity to be heard thereon.

History.

1968, c. 477, § 37.1-196; 1970, c. 346; 1972, c. 498; 1977, c. 88; 1979, c. 391; 1980, c. 582; 1998, c. 680; 2005, c. 716; 2007, c. 570; 2010, c. 71.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 570 substituted “terms; however a person first appointed to fill an unexpired term may serve three additional full three-year terms” for “three-year terms; however, persons appointed to fill vacancies may serve three additional full three-year terms” at the end of the sixth sentence and inserted the seventh and eighth sentences.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 71 substituted “one-year period” for “three-year period” in the next-to-last sentence.

§ 37.2-503.
Compensation of community services board members.

The governing body of any county or city or the governing bodies of any combination of cities and counties establishing a community services board may pay, out of its general fund or their general funds, no more than $600 per year to each board member as compensation for his attendance at board meetings. No city or county shall be reimbursed out of state or federal funds for any part of such compensation.

History.

1982, c. 23, § 37.1-196.1; 1998, c. 680; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-504.
Community services boards; local government departments; powers and duties.

Every operating and administrative policy community services board and local government department with a policy-advisory board shall have the following powers and duties:

Review and evaluate public and private community mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services and facilities that receive funds from it and advise the governing body of each city or county that established it as to its findings.

Pursuant to §

37.2-508

, submit to the governing body of each city or county that established it a performance contract for community mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services for its approval prior to submission of the contract to the Department.

Within amounts appropriated for this purpose, provide services authorized under the performance contract.

In accordance with its approved performance contract, enter into contracts with other providers for the delivery of services or operation of facilities.

In the case of operating and administrative policy boards, make policies or regulations concerning the delivery of services and operation of facilities under its direction or supervision, subject to applicable policies and regulations adopted by the Board.

In the case of an operating board, appoint an executive director of community mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services, who meets the minimum qualifications established by the Department, and prescribe his duties. The compensation of the executive director shall be fixed by the operating board within the amounts made available by appropriation for this purpose. The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the operating board and be employed under an annually renewable contract that contains performance objectives and evaluation criteria. For an operating board, the Department shall approve the selection of the executive director for adherence to minimum qualifications established by the Department and the salary range of the executive director. In the case of an administrative policy board, the board shall participate with local government in the appointment and annual performance evaluation of an executive director of community mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services, who meets the minimum qualifications established by the Department, and prescribe his duties. The compensation of the executive director shall be fixed by local government in consultation with the administrative policy board within the amounts made available by appropriation for this purpose. In the case of a local government department with a policy-advisory board, the director of the local government department shall serve as the executive director. The policy-advisory board shall participate in the selection and the annual performance evaluation of the executive director, who meets the minimum qualifications established by the Department. The compensation of the executive director shall be fixed by local government in consultation with the policy-advisory board within the amounts made available by appropriation for this purpose.

Prescribe a reasonable schedule of fees for services provided by personnel or facilities under the jurisdiction or supervision of the board and establish procedures for the collection of those fees. All fees collected shall be included in the performance contract submitted to the local governing body or bodies pursuant to subdivision 2 and §

37.2-508

and shall be used only for community mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services purposes. Every board shall institute a reimbursement system to maximize the collection of fees from individuals receiving services under its jurisdiction or supervision, consistent with the provisions of §

37.2-511

, and from responsible third party payors. Boards shall not attempt to bill or collect fees for time spent participating in commitment hearings for involuntary admissions pursuant to Article 5 (§

37.2-814

et seq.) of Chapter 8.

Accept or refuse gifts, donations, bequests, or grants of money or property from any source and utilize them as authorized by the governing body of each city or county that established it.

Seek and accept funds through federal grants. In accepting federal grants, the board shall not bind the governing body of any city or county that established it to any expenditures or conditions of acceptance without the prior approval of the governing body.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, disburse funds appropriated to it in accordance with such regulations as may be established by the governing body of each city or county that established it.

Apply for and accept loans as authorized by the governing body of each city or county that established it.

Develop joint written agreements, consistent with policies adopted by the Board, with local school divisions; health departments; boards of social services; housing agencies, where they exist; courts; sheriffs; area agencies on aging; and regional offices of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services. The agreements shall specify the services to be provided to individuals. All participating agencies shall develop and implement the agreements and shall review the agreements annually.

Take all necessary and appropriate actions to maximize the involvement and participation of individuals receiving services and family members of individuals receiving services in policy formulation and services planning, delivery, and evaluation.

Institute, singly or in combination with other community services boards or behavioral health authorities, a dispute resolution mechanism that is approved by the Department and enables individuals receiving services and family members of individuals receiving services to resolve concerns, issues, or disagreements about services without adversely affecting their access to or receipt of appropriate types and amounts of current or future services from the community services board.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

37.2-400

or any regulations adopted thereunder, release data and information about each individual receiving services to the Department so long as the Department implements procedures to protect the confidentiality of that data and information.

In the case of administrative policy boards and local government departments with policy-advisory boards, carry out other duties and responsibilities as assigned by the governing body of each city or county that established it.

In the case of an operating board, have authority, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to receive state and federal funds directly from the Department and act as its own fiscal agent, when authorized to do so by the governing body of each city or county that established it.

By local agreement between the administrative policy board and the governing body of the city or county that established it, additional responsibilities may be carried out by the local government, including personnel or financial management. In the case of an administrative policy board established by more than one city or county, the cities and counties shall designate which local government shall assume these responsibilities.

Every policy-advisory community services board, with staff support provided by the director of the local government department, shall have the following powers and duties:

Advise the local government regarding policies or regulations for the delivery of services and operation of facilities by the local government department, subject to applicable policies and regulations adopted by the Board.

Review and evaluate the operations of the local government department and advise the local governing body of each city or county that established it as to its findings.

Review the community mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services provided by the local government department and advise the local governing body of each city or county that established it as to its findings.

Review and comment on the performance contract, and performance reports developed by the local government department. The board’s comments shall be attached to the performance contract and performance reports prior to their submission to the local governing body of each city or county that established it and to the Department.

Advise the local government as to the necessary and appropriate actions to maximize the involvement and participation of individuals receiving services and family members of individuals receiving services in policy formulation and services planning, delivery, and evaluation.

Participate in the selection and the annual performance evaluation of the local government department director employed by the city or county.

Carry out other duties and responsibilities as assigned by the governing body of each city or county that established it.

History.

1968, c. 477, § 37.1-197; 1970, c. 346; 1972, c. 498; 1976, c. 671; 1977, c. 191; 1980, c. 582; 1982, c. 50; 1984, cc. 496, 505; 1986, c. 92; 1987, c. 79; 1995, c. 844; 1998, c. 680; 2005, cc. 75, 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507, 803, 805, 835, 836; 2022, c. 264.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 75 amended former § 37.1-197, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendment by c. 75 has been given effect in this section as set out above by adding subdivision A 18.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “developmental” for “mental retardation” throughout the section; in subdivision A 7, deleted “of this section” following “subdivision 2” and inserted “services” following “substance abuse” in the second sentence, and substituted “individuals” for “persons” in the third sentence; substituted “individuals” for “consumers” at the end of the second sentence of subdivision A 12; substituted “Comprehensive State Plan for Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Comprehensive State Plan for mental health, mental retardation, and substance abuse services” in subdivision A 13; substituted “individuals receiving services” for “consumers” twice in subdivisions A 14, A 15 and B 5; substituted “each individual receiving services” for “individual consumers” in subdivision A 16; and substituted “an operating board” for “operating boards” near the beginning of subdivision A 18.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, are identical, and deleted “of this section” following “subdivision 2” in the second sentence of subdivision A 7; and substituted “regional offices of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “regional Department of Rehabilitative Services offices” in the first sentence of subdivision A 12.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 805 and 836 are identical, and substituted “a performance contract” for “an annual performance contract” in subdivision A 2; and “the performance contract” for “the annual performance contract” in subdivision B 4.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 264, deleted former subdivision A 13, which read: “Develop and submit to the Department the necessary information for the preparation of the Comprehensive State Plan for Behavioral Health and Developmental Services pursuant to §

37.2-315

.”; redesignated former subdivision A 14 as current subdivision A 13 and redesignated accordingly; and, twice in subdivision B 4, inserted “and” following “contract” and deleted “and Comprehensive State Plan information” following “reports.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Agency of local government for tax purposes. —

Community services boards are divisions or agencies of local government, and therefore, exempt from state electric utility and natural gas consumption taxes under §§

58.1-2900

and

58.1-2904

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Judith Williams Jagdmann, Commissioner, State Corporation Commission, 17-027, 2018 Va. AG LEXIS 6 (6/15/18).

§ 37.2-505.
Coordination of services for preadmission screening and discharge planning.

The community services board shall fulfill the following responsibilities:

Be responsible for coordinating the community services necessary to accomplish effective preadmission screening and discharge planning for persons referred to the community services board. When preadmission screening reports are required by the court on an emergency basis pursuant to Article 5 (§

37.2-814

et seq.) of Chapter 8, the community services board shall ensure the development of the report for the court. To accomplish this coordination, the community services board shall establish a structure and procedures involving staff from the community services board and, as appropriate, representatives from (i) the state hospital or training center serving the board’s service area, (ii) the local department of social services, (iii) the health department, (iv) the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services office in the board’s service area, (v) the local school division, and (vi) other public and private human services agencies, including licensed hospitals.

Provide preadmission screening services prior to the admission for treatment pursuant to §

37.2-805

or Article 5 (§

37.2-814

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of any person who requires emergency mental health services while in a city or county served by the community services board. In the case of inmates incarcerated in a regional jail, each community services board that serves a county or city that is a participant in the regional jail shall review any existing Memorandum of Understanding between the community services board and any other community services boards that serve the regional jail to ensure that such memorandum sets forth the roles and responsibilities of each community services board in the preadmission screening process, provides for communication and information sharing protocols between the community services boards, and provides for due consideration, including financial consideration, should there be disproportionate obligations on one of the community services boards.

Provide, in consultation with the appropriate state hospital or training center, discharge planning for any individual who, prior to admission, resided in a city or county served by the community services board or who chooses to reside after discharge in a city or county served by the board and who is to be released from a state hospital or training center pursuant to §

37.2-837

. Upon initiation of discharge planning, the community services board that serves the city or county where the individual resided prior to admission shall inform the individual that he may choose to return to the county or city in which he resided prior to admission or to any other county or city in the Commonwealth. If the individual is unable to make informed decisions regarding his care, the community services board shall so inform his authorized representative, who may choose the county or city in which the individual shall reside upon discharge. In either case and to the extent permitted by federal law, for individuals who choose to return to the county or city in which they resided prior to admission, the community services board shall make every reasonable effort to place the individuals in such county or city. The community services board serving the county or city in which he will reside following discharge shall be responsible for arranging transportation for the individual upon request following the discharge protocols developed by the Department.The discharge plan shall be completed prior to the individual’s discharge. The plan shall be prepared with the involvement and participation of the individual receiving services or his representative and must reflect the individual’s preferences to the greatest extent possible. The plan shall include the mental health, developmental, substance abuse, social, educational, medical, employment, housing, legal, advocacy, transportation, and other services that the individual will need upon discharge into the community and identify the public or private agencies that have agreed to provide these services.No individual shall be discharged from a state hospital or training center without completion by the community services board of the discharge plan described in this subdivision. If state hospital or training center staff identify an individual as ready for discharge and the community services board that is responsible for the individual’s care disagrees, the community services board shall document in the treatment plan within 72 hours of the individual’s identification any reasons for not accepting the individual for discharge. If the state hospital or training center disagrees with the community services board and the board refuses to develop a discharge plan to accept the individual back into the community, the state hospital or training center or the community services board shall ask the Commissioner to review the state hospital’s or training center’s determination that the individual is ready for discharge in accordance with procedures established by the Department in collaboration with state hospitals, training centers, and community services boards. If the Commissioner determines that the individual is ready for discharge, a discharge plan shall be developed by the Department to ensure the availability of adequate services for the individual and the protection of the community. The Commissioner also shall verify that sufficient state-controlled funds have been allocated to the community services board through the performance contract. If sufficient state-controlled funds have been allocated, the Commissioner may contract with a private provider, another community services board, or a behavioral health authority to deliver the services specified in the discharge plan and withhold allocated funds applicable to that individual’s discharge plan from the community services board in accordance with subsections C and E of §

37.2-508

.

Provide information, if available, to all hospitals licensed pursuant to Article 1 (§

32.1-123

et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 32.1 about alcohol and substance abuse services available to minors.

The community services board may perform the functions set out in subdivision A 1 in the case of children by referring them to the locality’s family assessment and planning team and by cooperating with the community policy and management team in the coordination of services for troubled youths and their families. The community services board may involve the family assessment and planning team and the community policy and management team, but it remains responsible for performing the functions set out in subdivisions A 2 and A 3 in the case of children.

History.

1980, c. 582, § 37.1-197.1; 1986, c. 609; 1992, cc. 837, 880; 1995, c. 844; 1998, c. 680; 2002, c. 747; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 180, 476, 507, 656, 803, 813, 835; 2017, cc. 601, 606; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 249.

Cross references.

As to social services and public assistance provided to patients discharged from state hospitals or training centers provided by local social services boards pursuant to this section, see §

63.2-1602

.

Editor’s note.

In subdivision A 3, in the second sentence, “individual” was substituted for “consumer” to conform with Acts 2012, cc. 476 and 507, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 249, cl. 2 provides: “That the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall establish a work group with representatives of the Virginia Association of Community Services Boards to (i) review the current process for discharging patients from state mental health hospitals, including the current assigned responsibilities of state hospital staff and community services board staff, as well as the barriers to timely discharge for patients clinically ready to discharge, and (ii) develop potential options to expedite the discharge process for individuals who can be safely discharged back into the community. The work group shall develop a plan that includes recommendations for expediting the discharge process and shall identify the necessary funding to ensure that individuals receive essential services upon discharge and that discharges are timely. The work group shall report its findings and conclusions and its plan to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Education and Health by September 1, 2021.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 180 and 813 are identical, and added subdivision A 4.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and in subdivision A 3, substituted “individual” for “person” in the first sentence of the first paragraph; in the first sentence of the second paragraph, substituted “individual’s” for “person’s” and in the second sentence substituted “individual receiving services or his representative and must reflect the individual’s” for “consumer or his representative and must reflect the consumer’s”
and “developmental” for “mental retardation” and “individual” for “consumer” in the third sentence; and in the concluding paragraph of subsection A, substituted “individual” for “person,” “an individual” for “a consumer,” “individual’s” for “person’s,” “individual” for “consumer” and “individual’s” for “consumer’s.”

The 2012 amendment by c. 656 added the second through fifth sentences of subdivision A 3.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, are identical, and substituted “Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “Department of Rehabilitative Services” in the last sentence of subdivision A 1.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 601 and 606 are identical, and added the last sentence in subdivision A 2.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 249, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “72 hours” for “30 days” in the second sentence of the third paragraph in subdivision A 3.